Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 1
HOLDING COMPANIES GENERALLY

11-104-101. Prohibition on acquisition or control - limited service banking institutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bank holding company or other company may acquire or control any banking institution located in this state that does not both accept deposits that the depositor has a legal right to withdraw on demand and engage in the business of making commercial loans.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1109, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-6.3-101 (2) as it existed prior to 2003.